




















 



 Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business 
         










    










 













 











 



















Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business Combination
        																																						
              











 News provided by
Global Partner Acquisition Corp.  
Jul 27, 2017, 12:47 ET









 Share this article




























































NEW YORK and ALPINE, Utah, July 27, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Global Partner Acquisition Corp. (NASDAQ:    GPAC; GPACW; GPACU), a special purpose acquisition company ("GPAC"), and Purple Innovation, LLC ("Purple") jointly announced today that on July 24, 2017 they entered into a non-binding letter of intent relating to a business combination (the "LOI"), pursuant to which Purple would become a publicly traded company. 








Summary of Transaction Under the terms of the LOI, GPAC and Purple intend to enter into a definitive agreement, pursuant to which GPAC would acquire Purple based on an enterprise value of $1.1 billion, with GPAC paying a portion of the purchase price in cash to the current equity holders (currently anticipated to be approximately $90 million) and with the remainder being paid in rollover equity interests in the combined public company, subject to customary adjustments. Additional cash will be going to the balance sheet of Purple.
As contemplated by the LOI, Purple founders Terry and Tony Pearce would retain a majority shareholder position in the combined public company with Sam Bernards continuing to lead the combined company as CEO. Founders Terry and Tony Pearce will remain with the combined company.
The net cash proceeds from this transaction that are not distributed to Purple's shareholders are expected to provide Purple with additional growth capital, allowing Purple to continue executing its long-term growth plan while providing Purple with greater access to capital to fund future innovation and acquisitions.
Completion of the business combination is subject to, among other matters, GPAC and Purple entering into a definitive agreement for the business combination and completing their due diligence investigation of the other, approval by GPAC stockholders and other closing conditions to be included in the merger agreement.
Paul Zepf, CEO of GPAC, said, "I believe Purple is a tremendous merger partner for GPAC, given its powerful brand and highly differentiated portfolio of comfort technology solutions. The company's revolutionary products, vertically integrated design and manufacturing expertise, and world-class marketing capabilities ideally position the company to disrupt multiple massive industries that are ripe for innovation. We are also very excited by Purple's financial model that displays a unique combination of growth, scale, and profitability. We are pleased to partner with Terry, Tony and Sam and look forward to their continued leadership of Purple."
Purple is a leading comfort technology company which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It designs and manufactures a range of comfort technology products, including mattresses, pillows, and cushions, using its patented Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology designed to improve comfort. Purple's founders, Terry and Tony Pearce, have a 20-year history developing innovative comfort technology and, prior to and separate from the launch of Purple, have developed and licensed numerous technologies to notable global brands.
Terry Pearce said, "We are excited to become a publicly traded company through our merger with GPAC. The GPAC team is an ideal partner led by experienced public market investors and executives that will add significant value to Purple. We believe Purple is uniquely positioned in the market and this transaction will allow us to better take advantage of our large market opportunity and continue our rapid, profitable growth."
Purple's intellectual property, history of innovation of its founders, and deep vertical integration, including proprietary equipment and design and manufacturing expertise, create a significant competitive moat and differentiate Purple from many competitors that outsource production of their products. Purple's growth is also supported by a top-notch marketing team that has generated strong brand awareness and has driven customer acquisitions. Purple's marketing team has also generated a large social media following that is highly engaged with the Purple brand.
Purple markets and sells its products through direct-to-consumer and traditional retail channels. The legacy mattress industry is inefficient, and is characterized by aggressive mark-ups, dated products, and limited innovation. Purple believes there is significant opportunity for further direct-to-consumer penetration within the overall mattress market and that it is one of the leaders of this trend. Direct-to-consumer companies are benefiting from trends including older demographics experiencing discomfort and increasing spending from health-conscious younger demographics. Consumers across demographics are increasingly shopping online, using mobile devices and social media to inform shopping behavior, all of which benefit Purple's direct-to-consumer and multi-channel distribution strategies. 
Purple is pursuing partnerships and opportunities to support its multi-channel distribution strategy. Purple announced in May 2017 plans for an initial test with Mattress Firm to prominently feature Purple's products in select retail locations. Mattress Firm has approximately 3,500 locations across the US, representing a significant opportunity for Purple. Purple has numerous product, channel, and geographic expansion opportunities that it anticipates will drive significant growth.
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Piper Jaffray Companies, and Raymond James & Associates, Inc. are serving as financial and capital markets advisors to GPAC. Headwaters MB LLC is serving as financial advisor to Purple. Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP is acting as legal advisor to GPAC, and Dorsey & Whitney LLP is acting as legal advisor to Purple.
About PurplePurple is a leading comfort technology company, which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It offers cushions, pillows, and other comfort products using its proprietary Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology. All products are focused on founders Terry and Tony Pearce's vision to improve comfort. Purple continues to be a disruptor to the traditional mattress industry with its innovative products, packaging and shipping, direct-to-consumer sales, and generous trial and return policies.
About Global Partner Acquisition Corp.Global Partner Acquisition Corp. is a special purpose acquisition company formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization, or similar business combination. GPAC's units began trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market on July 30, 2015 and its securities trade on NASDAQ under the ticker symbols GPAC, GPACW and GPACU. 
Forward Looking Statements Certain statements made in this release are "forward looking statements" within the meaning of the "safe harbor" provisions of the United States Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "estimates," "projected," "expects," "anticipates," "forecasts," "plans," "intends," "believes," "seeks," "may," "will," "should," "future," "propose" and variations of these words or similar expressions (or the negative versions of such words or expressions) are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance, conditions or results, and involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which are outside GPAC's or Purple's control, that could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking statements. Important factors, among others, that may affect actual results or outcomes include: the inability to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to the proposed business combination or to complete the transactions contemplated by the LOI; matters discovered by Purple or GPAC as they complete their respective due diligence investigation of the other; the inability to recognize the anticipated benefits of the proposed business combination, which may be affected by, among other things, the amount of cash available following any redemptions by GPAC stockholders; the ability to meet NASDAQ's listing standards following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the proposed business combination; costs related to the proposed business combination; Purple's ability to manage growth; Purple's ability to execute its plans to develop and market new products and the timing and costs of these development programs; Purple's estimates of the size of the markets for its products; the rate and degree of market acceptance of Purple's products; the success of other competing cushioning and bedding technologies that exist or may become available; Purple's ability to identify and integrate acquisitions; the performance of Purple's products; rising costs adversely affecting Purple's profitability; potential litigation involving GPAC or Purple or the validity or enforceability of Purple's intellectual property; and general economic and market conditions impacting demand for Purple's products. Other factors include the possibility that the proposed transaction does not close, including due to the failure to receive required security holder approvals, or the failure of other closing conditions. Neither GPAC nor Purple undertakes any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.
Additional Information about the Transaction and Where to Find It In connection with the proposed business combination, GPAC will file preliminary and definitive proxy statements with the SEC and will mail a definitive proxy statement and other relevant documents to its stockholders. Investors and security holders of GPAC are advised to read, when available, the preliminary proxy statement, and amendments thereto, and the definitive proxy statement in connection with GPAC's solicitation of proxies for its stockholders' meeting to be held to approve the proposed business combination because the proxy statements will contain important information about the proposed business combination and the parties to it. The definitive proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of GPAC as of a record date to be established for voting on the proposed business combination. Stockholders will also be able to obtain copies of the proxy statement, without charge, once available, at the SEC's website at www.sec.gov or by directing a request to: Global Partner Acquisition Corp., c/o Andrew Cook, 1 Rockefeller Plaza, 11th Floor New York, New York 10020, e-mail: info@globalpartnerac.com.
Participants in the Solicitation GPAC, Purple, and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees, under SEC rules, may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies of GPAC stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination. Investors and security holders may obtain more detailed information regarding the names, affiliations and interests in GPAC's directors and in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, which was filed with the SEC on March 14, 2017. Information regarding the persons who may, under SEC rules, be deemed participants in the solicitation of proxies to the GPAC's stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination will be set forth in the proxy statement for the proposed business combination when available. Information concerning the interests of GPAC's and Purple's participants in the solicitation, which may, in some cases, be different than those of GPAC's and Purple's equity holders generally, will be set forth in the proxy statement relating to the proposed business combination when it becomes available.
DisclaimerThis release shall neither constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
Contact information Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Paul Zepf Chief Executive Officer pzepf@globalpartnerac.com 917-244-4880
Purple Innovation, LLC For information regarding the transaction, please contact Bill Harrison: Bill Harrison Head of Consumer Investment Banking, Headwaters MB LLC  wharrison@headwatersmb.com  917-596-5533 
For information regarding Purple products, please contact Savannah Turk: Savannah Turk Director of Communications, Purple Innovation, LLC savannah@onpurple.com 801-756-2600 ext 244
View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/global-partner-acquisition-corp-and-purple-innovation-llc-announce-letter-of-intent-for-business-combination-300495476.html
SOURCE Global Partner Acquisition Corp.



 













Jan 11, 2017, 16:02 ET
Preview: Sequel Youth and Family Services and Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Announce Agreement for Business Combination






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 You just read:
Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business Combination


 News provided by
Global Partner Acquisition Corp.  
Jul 27, 2017, 12:47 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 























 



 Sequel Youth and Family Services and Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Announce Agreement for 
         










    










 













 











 



















Sequel Youth and Family Services and Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Announce Agreement for Business Combination
        																																															
              

          -Positions Sequel to Execute on the Compelling Growth Opportunities in the Behavioral Healthcare Industry--Sequel Executive Team to Continue Leading Company--Companies to Conduct Investor Conference Call on January 11, 2017 at 5:30 pm EST-
        











 News provided by
Global Partner Acquisition Corp.  
Jan 11, 2017, 16:02 ET









 Share this article




























































HUNTSVILLE, Ala. and NEW YORK, Jan. 11, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Sequel Youth and Family Services ("Sequel"), a leading, national provider of diversified behavioral health services for children, adolescents and adults with behavioral, emotional or physical challenges, and Global Partner Acquisition Corp. (Nasdaq:    GPAC; GPACW; GPACU), a special purpose acquisition company ("GPAC"), today announced they have entered into a definitive merger agreement. This transaction will enable Sequel to become a Nasdaq-listed public company, with an anticipated initial enterprise value of approximately $423.3 million. Immediately upon consummation of the transaction, GPAC will change its name to Sequel Youth and Family Services, Inc.








Sequel Investment Highlights

Diversified revenue, geography, referral and payor mix, with 44 programs across 19 U.S. states serving approximately 9,000 clients from 42 states and U.S. territories 
Comprehensive, unique and scalable spectrum of services, with a focus on the fragmented and growing $11.0 billion youth behavioral healthcare market and $23.0 billion autism spectrum disorder market 
Attractive financial profile; consistent program revenue and adjusted EBITDA growth (22.5% and 24.9% compounded annual growth rates (CAGRs), respectively, from the fiscal year ended June 30, 2000 to the fiscal year ended June 30, 2016). Growth driven by: 
     
Strong organic revenue growth (7.5% average annually over the past five fiscal years); and 
Active acquisition strategy, adding and integrating 31 programs through 10 successful acquisitions since 2007, with a strong pipeline of actionable acquisition opportunities 

Consistent and strong free cash flow conversion rate of greater than 90% over the past five fiscal years 
Talented and experienced management team, leading an extraordinary staff culture and impressive regulatory compliance record 

Program revenue, adjusted EBITDA, free cash flows and free cash flow conversion rate are non-GAAP items that are explained under "Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures" below.
Paul Zepf, Chief Executive Officer of GPAC, said: "After evaluating over 60 companies for a potential business combination, Sequel clearly stood out to us as the most impressive partner. The Sequel executive team has successfully established the company as a best-in-class behavioral healthcare provider. In addition to possessing an attractive financial profile, a differentiated business model and a track record of balanced growth, Sequel is a mission-driven company with a tremendous corporate culture that guides everything they do. They are widely recognized for the superior quality of their programs and outstanding client satisfaction, and we look forward to working with Sequel's management team to continue to grow the business as a public company."
The Sequel management team will continue to lead the combined company following the business combination, led by Jay Ripley, as Co-Founder and Chairman, John Stupak, as Chief Executive Officer and Vice-Chairman, Mandy Moses, as President and COO, and Sybil Potts, as Executive VP and CFO.
Jay Ripley, Co-Founder and Chairman of Sequel, stated: "Over the past 18 years, I've been delighted to watch Sequel grow to the point where we're now serving approximately 9,000 clients through our 44 programs in 19 states.  At Sequel, our goal is to prepare our clients to lead responsible and fulfilling lives, and to accomplish this we focus on doing the right thing for each client every day.  Today's transaction announcement marks the beginning of an exciting new chapter in our history.  We're delighted to be partnering with GPAC, a supportive, value-added partner, to become a publicly-traded company.  We believe that becoming a public company will enable us to access permanent equity capital and position us to continue our growth trajectory by expanding and enhancing our program offerings in existing and new geographies."
John Stupak, Chief Executive Officer who will also become Vice-Chairman of the combined company, said: "The U.S. behavioral healthcare industry is a $220.0 billion market and due to a favorable legislative environment and significant barriers to entry, we expect to see a continuation of favorable supply and demand trends.  Importantly, behavioral health coverage was increased as part of the recently-passed 21st Century Cures Act, which builds on the landmark Mental Health Parity Act. By partnering with GPAC's team – that clearly has demonstrated the ability to develop quality businesses and create significant value for investors – our management team is eager to further elevate Sequel's standing as a leader in the behavioral health services universe."
Financial Highlights and Initial Outlook 
From the fiscal year ended June 30, 2011 through the fiscal year ended June 30, 2016, Sequel's program revenue, total revenue and adjusted EBITDA increased at CAGRs of 12.1%, 12.4% and 13.8%, respectively. For the fiscal year ended June 30, 2016, Sequel reported program revenue of $208.0 million, total revenue of $200.4 million, adjusted EBITDA of $31.3 million and free cash flows of $28.8 million. 
For the fiscal year ended June 30, 2017, Sequel forecasts program revenue, total revenue, adjusted EBITDA and free cash flows of $253.9 million, $246.1 million, $39.7 million and $36.8 million, respectively, which represents an increase of 22.1%, 22.8%, 26.8% and 27.8%, respectively, from the fiscal year ended June 30, 2016.  
For calendar 2017, Sequel forecasts program revenue, total revenue, adjusted EBITDA and free cash flows of $269.2 million, $261.4 million, $43.0 million and $40.0 million, respectively. 
Sequel's business model relies on low levels of capital expenditures, enabling a consistent, strong free cash flow conversion rate of greater than 90.0% over the past five fiscal years. Since 2011, growth has been driven by a combination of successful organic initiatives, including capacity and breadth of services expansion at existing facilities, as well as an active acquisition strategy, adding 20 programs through seven transactions. 




 Summary Financial Measures:    


 $ in millions     



 For the Fiscal Year Ended, 

 For the Calendar Year Ended, 



 June 30, 2016Actual 
 June 30, 2017Projected 
 % Change 
 December 31, 2017Projected 








 Program Revenue 
 $ 
 208.0 
 $ 
 253.9 
 22.1% 
 $ 
 269.2 











 Total Revenue 

 200.4 

 246.1 
 22.8% 

 261.4 











 Adjusted EBITDA 

 31.3 

 39.7 
 26.8% 

 43.0 








 Free Cash Flow 
 $ 
 28.8 
 $ 
 36.8 
 27.8% 
 $ 
 40.0 


 Free Cash Flow Conversion Rate 

 92.0% 

 92.7% 


 93.0% 










              
Summary of Transaction
In the business combination, the Sequel common equity holders will receive newly issued Sequel common units exchangeable initially for 4,500,000 shares of GPAC common stock, $105.0 million in cash, and GPAC warrants to purchase 3,266,000 shares of GPAC common stock. The Sequel preferred equity holders will receive a cash distribution of $30.0 million and approximately $62.2 million in newly-issued Sequel preferred units having certain preferred returns and other rights.
At closing, assuming all equity interests to be issued to the Sequel equity holders are exchanged in full for GPAC stock, all of GPAC's founder shares vest, all warrants are exercised for cash and there are no shareholder redemptions, the current Sequel equity holders will own approximately 20.7% of the combined company, with GPAC shareholders owning the remaining approximately 79.3%. Sequel's Co-Founder and Chairman, Jay Ripley will own approximately 14.4%. 
GPAC intends to pay the cash consideration and transaction expenses for the business combination primarily from the approximately $155.3 million of cash currently in its trust account and approximately $2.8 million in borrowings at closing under Sequel's revolving credit facility.
In order to facilitate the transaction, GPAC's Sponsor has agreed to subject 40.0% of its shares of GPAC common stock to vesting based upon the common stock price performance of the post-business combination company over an eight year period following the consummation of the business combination. GPAC's Sponsor also agreed to forfeit approximately 58.8% of the warrants that it owns to permit the issuance of the warrants to Sequel's existing equity holders in the business combination and fund a new equity pool for employees.
The transaction has been approved by the boards of directors of both GPAC and Sequel. Completion of the transaction is subject to approval by the GPAC stockholders and certain other conditions. The transaction is expected to close in April 2017.
Advisors
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. acted as financial advisor and joint capital markets advisor, Raymond James Financial, Inc. acted as joint capital markets advisor and Pepper Hamilton LLP and Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP acted as legal counsel to GPAC. Additionally, GPAC utilized a Big four accounting firm, Marwood Group LLC and Aon PLC during its diligence process.  Bengur Bryan & Co., Inc. acted as financial advisor and Brown, Winick, Et All, PLC acted as legal counsel to Sequel.  
Conference Call Information
At 5:30 pm EST on January 11, 2017, Sequel and GPAC will host a joint conference call to discuss the business combination with the investment community. Hosting the call will be Paul Zepf, GPAC's Chief Executive Officer; Jay Ripley, Sequel's Co-Founder and Chairman; and John Stupak, Sequel's Chief Executive Officer who will also become Sequel's Vice Chairman.
For those who wish to participate, the domestic toll-free access number is (877) 407-0789 or (201) 689-8562 for international callers.
A replay of the call will also be available from 8:00 pm EST on January 11, 2017 to 11:59 pm EST on February 11, 2017. To access the replay, domestic callers should dial (844) 512-2921 and international callers should dial (412) 317-6671, and enter the PIN number of 13652851.
About GPAC
Global Partner Acquisition Corp. is a blank check company formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization or similar business combination. GPAC's units began trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market July 30, 2015. Its securities are quoted under the ticker symbols GPAC, GPACW and GPACU.
About Sequel
Sequel was founded in 1999 to operate a single school for adjudicated delinquent boys. Since then the company has experienced tremendous growth, and is now a leading, national provider of diversified behavioral health services for children, adolescents and adults, with 44 programs across the U.S.  Sequel offers a comprehensive, unique, and scalable spectrum of services with a historical focus on the unmet mental health needs of at-risk adolescents.
Projections and Forward Looking Statements
This release contains financial forecasts with respect to Sequel's projected program revenues, projected total revenues, projected adjusted EBITDA, projected free cash flows and projected free cash flow conversion and additional statements constituting "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the "safe harbor" provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements may be identified by the use of words such as "estimate," "plan," "project," "forecast," "intend," "expect," "anticipate," "believe," "seek," "target" and other similar expressions that predict or indicate future events or trends or that are not statements of historical matters.  Such forward-looking statements include the timing of the proposed business combination; the business plans, objectives, expectations and intentions of the parties once the transaction is complete, and GPAC's and Sequel's estimated and future results of operations, business strategies, competitive position, industry environment and potential growth opportunities.  These forward-looking statements reflect the current analysis of existing information and are subject to various risks and uncertainties.  As a result, caution must be exercised in relying on forward-looking statements.  Due to known and unknown risks, actual results may differ materially from our expectations or projections. 
The financial forecasts have not been audited or reviewed by GPAC's or Sequel's independent auditors who do not express an opinion or provide any other form of assurance with respect thereto for the purpose of this release. 
Furthermore, the unaudited prospective financial information does not take into account any circumstances or events occurring after January 9, 2017, the date it was prepared. None of the prospective financial information provided herein should be relied upon as being necessarily indicative of future results, and readers of this release are cautioned not to rely on the prospective financial information.
The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in these forward-looking statements: the occurrence of any event, change or other circumstances that could give rise to the termination of the merger agreement; the outcome of any legal proceedings that may be instituted against Sequel or GPAC following the announcement of the proposed business combination and the transactions contemplated thereby; the inability to complete the proposed business combination due to the failure to obtain approval of the stockholders of GPAC, or other conditions to closing in the merger agreement; the inability to maintain the listing of GPAC's common stock and warrants on The NASDAQ Capital Market or any other stock exchange following the proposed business combination; the risk that the proposed business combination may disrupt current plans and operations as a result of the announcement and consummation of the transactions described herein; the inability to recognize the anticipated benefits of the proposed business combination, which may be affected by, among other things, competition and the inability of the combined business to grow and manage growth profitably; costs related to the proposed business combination; changes in level of spending of government (including Medicaid), commercial and private payors on the services which Sequel provides; the consolidation of managed-care organizations and their third-party payors; increases in controls over healthcare costs; the risk of care incidents and associated negative publicity; the risk of legal complaints and proceedings and government investigations; changes in applicable laws or regulations, including expected regulatory changes in healthcare laws following the recent U.S. elections, especially the expected changes to the Affordable Care Act; the inability to comply with licensing or other regulatory requirements, laws and regulations; the intense competition in the industry; the inability to profitably expand into new markets; cybersecurity risks and the failure to protect patients' health information; the failure to comply with proper billing practices; the possibility that Sequel or GPAC may be adversely affected by other economic, business, and/or competitive factors; the risk of loss of key personnel or inability to recruit talent; and other risks and uncertainties described herein, as well as those risks and uncertainties discussed from time to time in other reports and other public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") by GPAC and Sequel.
Additional information concerning these and other factors that may impact our expectations and projections can be found in GPAC's periodic filings with the SEC, including its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015 and in the proxy statement to be filed by GPAC with the SEC when available.  GPAC's SEC filings are available publicly on the SEC's website at www.sec.gov.  GPAC and Sequel disclaim any obligation to update the forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.
Additional Information about the Transaction and Where to Find It
In connection with the proposed business combination, GPAC will file preliminary and definitive proxy statements with the SEC and will mail a definitive proxy statement and other relevant documents to its stockholders.  Investors and security holders of GPAC are advised to read, when available, the preliminary proxy statement, and amendments thereto, and the definitive proxy statement in connection with GPAC's solicitation of proxies for its stockholders' meeting to be held to approve the proposed business combination because the proxy statements will contain important information about the proposed business combination and the parties to it.  The definitive proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of GPAC as of a record date to be established for voting on the proposed business combination.  Stockholders will also be able to obtain copies of the proxy statement, without charge, once available, at the SEC's website at www.sec.gov or by directing a request to: Global Partner Acquisition Corp., c/o Andrew Cook, 1 Rockefeller Plaza, 11th Floor New York, New York 10020, e-mail: info@globalpartnerac.com.
Participants in the Solicitation
GPAC, Sequel, and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees, under SEC rules, may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies of GPAC stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination.  Investors and security holders may obtain more detailed information regarding the names, affiliations and interests in GPAC of directors and officers of GPAC in the company's proxy statement for its 2016 annual meeting, which was filed with the SEC on November 21, 2016.  Information regarding the persons who may, under SEC rules, be deemed participants in the solicitation of proxies to the GPAC's stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination will be set forth in the proxy statement for the proposed business combination when available.  Information concerning the interests of GPAC's and Sequel's participants in the solicitation, which may, in some cases, be different than those of GPAC's and Sequel's equity holders generally, will be set forth in the proxy statement relating to the proposed business combination when it becomes available.
Disclaimer
This release shall neither constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
Financial Information
In this release, "total revenue" means net program service revenue plus provider service revenue as reported in the financial statements of Sequel.
Use of Non-GAAP Financial Measures
This release includes non-GAAP financial measures of Sequel, including program revenue, EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA, free cash flows and free cash flow conversion.  In this release, "program revenue" is total program billings, including (i) amounts billed by Sequel on behalf of not-for-profits under its provider service agreements, of which a portion of the billings are retained by the not-for-profits and (ii) individually significant disposals.  "EBITDA" means net income (loss) before interest expense, income taxes and depreciation and amortization. "Adjusted EBITDA" means EBITDA adjusted for items that are not part of regular operating activities, including acquisition costs, founder's fee and profits interest expense (both of which will cease post-closing of the transaction) and non-cash items such as non-cash unit based compensation, losses on disposal of property, losses from discontinued operations and individually significant disposals and expenses related to tax changes. Adjusted EBITDA does not represent, and should not be considered as, an alternative to net income or cash flows from operations, each as determined in accordance with GAAP. "Free cash flows" means adjusted EBITDA less capital expenditures. "Free cash flow conversion" means adjusted EBITDA less capital expenditures, divided by adjusted EBITDA.
We have presented program revenue, EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA, program revenue, free cash flows and free cash flow conversion in this release because we consider them key measures used by Sequel management to understand and evaluate Sequel's operating performance and trends, to prepare and approve Sequel's annual budget and to develop short- and long-term operational plans, and believe that those measures are frequently used by analysts, investors and other interested parties in the evaluation of companies. Other companies may calculate program revenue, EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA, free cash flows and free cash flow conversion differently than we do. EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA, program revenue, free cash flows and free cash flow conversion have limitations as analytical tools, and you should not consider them in isolation or as a substitute for analysis of our results as reported under GAAP. 
A reconciliation of these non-GAAP measures can be found in the investor presentation, which is an exhibit to GPAC's Form 8-K filed with the SEC and can be found on the SEC's website at www.sec.gov and was also posted on the GPAC website at www.globalpartnerac.com and the Sequel website at www.sequelyouthservices.com.
Contacts
Investors:David Clair: 646-277-1266Sequel@icrinc.com
or
Media:Brian Ruby: 203-682-8268Brian.Ruby@icrinc.com Jim Heins: 203-682-8251James.Heins@icrinc.com
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/sequel-youth-and-family-services-and-global-partner-acquisition-corp-announce-agreement-for-business-combination-300389738.html
SOURCE Global Partner Acquisition Corp.



 












Jul 27, 2017, 12:47 ET
Preview: Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business Combination













Aug 12, 2015, 16:30 ET
Preview: Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Common Stock And Warrants To Commence Trading Separately On August 13, 2015






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 Also from this source




 

Jul 27, 2017, 12:47 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC...






 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
  Health Care & Hospitals
  Mental Health
Acquisitions, Mergers and Takeovers
Earnings Forecasts & Projections








 You just read:
Sequel Youth and Family Services and Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Announce Agreement for Business Combination


 News provided by
Global Partner Acquisition Corp.  
Jan 11, 2017, 16:02 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Anno - NewsOn6.com - Tulsa, OK - News, Weather, Video and Sports - KOTV.com | 













  







Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Anno - NewsOn6.com - Tulsa, OK - News, Weather, Video and Sports - KOTV.com | 

6 InvestigatesCrime Special Coverage Send Us News TipsHealthStrange NewsEmail Sign-UpOU Football: 2017 Preseason Watch ListSpinach And Rice Stuffed Bell PeppersLatest RecipesBy TypeBy SpecialtySign Up For Recipe EmailsMainEntertainmentMoneyHome/FamilyHealthFoodPetsTechTravelBeauty & StyleAutoVideoBytesPress ReleasesText & WinFood for KidsEmail Sign-Up6 In The Morning




Member Center:Create Account|Log InManage Account|Log Out

SITE SEARCHWEB SEARCH BY 




Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business Combination




Information contained on this page is provided by an independent third-party content provider. Frankly and this Site make no warranties or representations in connection therewith. If you are affiliated with this page and would like it removed please contact pressreleases@franklyinc.comSOURCE  Global Partner Acquisition Corp.NEW YORK and ALPINE, Utah, July 27, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Global Partner Acquisition Corp. (NASDAQ: GPAC; GPACW; GPACU), a special purpose acquisition company ("GPAC"), and Purple Innovation, LLC ("Purple") jointly announced today that on July 24, 2017 they entered into a non-binding letter of intent relating to a business combination (the "LOI"), pursuant to which Purple would become a publicly traded company. Summary of Transaction Under the terms of the LOI, GPAC and Purple intend to enter into a definitive agreement, pursuant to which GPAC would acquire Purple based on an enterprise value of $1.1 billion, with GPAC paying a portion of the purchase price in cash to the current equity holders (currently anticipated to be approximately $90 million) and with the remainder being paid in rollover equity interests in the combined public company, subject to customary adjustments. Additional cash will be going to the balance sheet of Purple.As contemplated by the LOI, Purple founders Terry and Tony Pearce would retain a majority shareholder position in the combined public company with Sam Bernards continuing to lead the combined company as CEO. Founders Terry and Tony Pearce will remain with the combined company.The net cash proceeds from this transaction that are not distributed to Purple's shareholders are expected to provide Purple with additional growth capital, allowing Purple to continue executing its long-term growth plan while providing Purple with greater access to capital to fund future innovation and acquisitions.Completion of the business combination is subject to, among other matters, GPAC and Purple entering into a definitive agreement for the business combination and completing their due diligence investigation of the other, approval by GPAC stockholders and other closing conditions to be included in the merger agreement.Paul Zepf, CEO of GPAC, said, "I believe Purple is a tremendous merger partner for GPAC, given its powerful brand and highly differentiated portfolio of comfort technology solutions. The company's revolutionary products, vertically integrated design and manufacturing expertise, and world-class marketing capabilities ideally position the company to disrupt multiple massive industries that are ripe for innovation. We are also very excited by Purple's financial model that displays a unique combination of growth, scale, and profitability. We are pleased to partner with Terry, Tony and Sam and look forward to their continued leadership of Purple."Purple is a leading comfort technology company which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It designs and manufactures a range of comfort technology products, including mattresses, pillows, and cushions, using its patented Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology designed to improve comfort. Purple's founders, Terry and Tony Pearce, have a 20-year history developing innovative comfort technology and, prior to and separate from the launch of Purple, have developed and licensed numerous technologies to notable global brands.Terry Pearce said, "We are excited to become a publicly traded company through our merger with GPAC. The GPAC team is an ideal partner led by experienced public market investors and executives that will add significant value to Purple. We believe Purple is uniquely positioned in the market and this transaction will allow us to better take advantage of our large market opportunity and continue our rapid, profitable growth."Purple's intellectual property, history of innovation of its founders, and deep vertical integration, including proprietary equipment and design and manufacturing expertise, create a significant competitive moat and differentiate Purple from many competitors that outsource production of their products. Purple's growth is also supported by a top-notch marketing team that has generated strong brand awareness and has driven customer acquisitions. Purple's marketing team has also generated a large social media following that is highly engaged with the Purple brand.Purple markets and sells its products through direct-to-consumer and traditional retail channels. The legacy mattress industry is inefficient, and is characterized by aggressive mark-ups, dated products, and limited innovation. Purple believes there is significant opportunity for further direct-to-consumer penetration within the overall mattress market and that it is one of the leaders of this trend. Direct-to-consumer companies are benefiting from trends including older demographics experiencing discomfort and increasing spending from health-conscious younger demographics. Consumers across demographics are increasingly shopping online, using mobile devices and social media to inform shopping behavior, all of which benefit Purple's direct-to-consumer and multi-channel distribution strategies. Purple is pursuing partnerships and opportunities to support its multi-channel distribution strategy. Purple announced in May 2017 plans for an initial test with Mattress Firm to prominently feature Purple's products in select retail locations. Mattress Firm has approximately 3,500 locations across the US, representing a significant opportunity for Purple. Purple has numerous product, channel, and geographic expansion opportunities that it anticipates will drive significant growth.Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Piper Jaffray Companies, and Raymond James & Associates, Inc. are serving as financial and capital markets advisors to GPAC. Headwaters MB LLC is serving as financial advisor to Purple. Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP is acting as legal advisor to GPAC, and Dorsey & Whitney LLP is acting as legal advisor to Purple.About PurplePurple is a leading comfort technology company, which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It offers cushions, pillows, and other comfort products using its proprietary Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology. All products are focused on founders Terry and Tony Pearce's vision to improve comfort. Purple continues to be a disruptor to the traditional mattress industry with its innovative products, packaging and shipping, direct-to-consumer sales, and generous trial and return policies.About Global Partner Acquisition Corp.Global Partner Acquisition Corp. is a special purpose acquisition company formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization, or similar business combination. GPAC's units began trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market on July 30, 2015 and its securities trade on NASDAQ under the ticker symbols GPAC, GPACW and GPACU. Forward Looking Statements Certain statements made in this release are "forward looking statements" within the meaning of the "safe harbor" provisions of the United States Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "estimates," "projected," "expects," "anticipates," "forecasts," "plans," "intends," "believes," "seeks," "may," "will," "should," "future," "propose" and variations of these words or similar expressions (or the negative versions of such words or expressions) are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance, conditions or results, and involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which are outside GPAC's or Purple's control, that could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking statements. Important factors, among others, that may affect actual results or outcomes include: the inability to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to the proposed business combination or to complete the transactions contemplated by the LOI; matters discovered by Purple or GPAC as they complete their respective due diligence investigation of the other; the inability to recognize the anticipated benefits of the proposed business combination, which may be affected by, among other things, the amount of cash available following any redemptions by GPAC stockholders; the ability to meet NASDAQ's listing standards following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the proposed business combination; costs related to the proposed business combination; Purple's ability to manage growth; Purple's ability to execute its plans to develop and market new products and the timing and costs of these development programs; Purple's estimates of the size of the markets for its products; the rate and degree of market acceptance of Purple's products; the success of other competing cushioning and bedding technologies that exist or may become available; Purple's ability to identify and integrate acquisitions; the performance of Purple's products; rising costs adversely affecting Purple's profitability; potential litigation involving GPAC or Purple or the validity or enforceability of Purple's intellectual property; and general economic and market conditions impacting demand for Purple's products. Other factors include the possibility that the proposed transaction does not close, including due to the failure to receive required security holder approvals, or the failure of other closing conditions. Neither GPAC nor Purple undertakes any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.Additional Information about the Transaction and Where to Find It In connection with the proposed business combination, GPAC will file preliminary and definitive proxy statements with the SEC and will mail a definitive proxy statement and other relevant documents to its stockholders. Investors and security holders of GPAC are advised to read, when available, the preliminary proxy statement, and amendments thereto, and the definitive proxy statement in connection with GPAC's solicitation of proxies for its stockholders' meeting to be held to approve the proposed business combination because the proxy statements will contain important information about the proposed business combination and the parties to it. The definitive proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of GPAC as of a record date to be established for voting on the proposed business combination. Stockholders will also be able to obtain copies of the proxy statement, without charge, once available, at the SEC's website at www.sec.gov or by directing a request to: Global Partner Acquisition Corp., c/o Andrew Cook, 1 Rockefeller Plaza, 11th Floor New York, New York 10020, e-mail: info@globalpartnerac.com.Participants in the Solicitation GPAC, Purple, and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees, under SEC rules, may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies of GPAC stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination. Investors and security holders may obtain more detailed information regarding the names, affiliations and interests in GPAC's directors and in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, which was filed with the SEC on March 14, 2017. Information regarding the persons who may, under SEC rules, be deemed participants in the solicitation of proxies to the GPAC's stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination will be set forth in the proxy statement for the proposed business combination when available. Information concerning the interests of GPAC's and Purple's participants in the solicitation, which may, in some cases, be different than those of GPAC's and Purple's equity holders generally, will be set forth in the proxy statement relating to the proposed business combination when it becomes available.DisclaimerThis release shall neither constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.Contact information Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Paul Zepf Chief Executive Officer pzepf@globalpartnerac.com 917-244-4880Purple Innovation, LLC For information regarding the transaction, please contact Bill Harrison: Bill Harrison Head of Consumer Investment Banking, Headwaters MB LLC  wharrison@headwatersmb.com  917-596-5533 For information regarding Purple products, please contact Savannah Turk: Savannah Turk Director of Communications, Purple Innovation, LLC savannah@onpurple.com 801-756-2600 ext 244View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/global-partner-acquisition-corp-and-purple-innovation-llc-announce-letter-of-intent-for-business-combination-300495476.html©2017 PR Newswire. All Rights Reserved.




























			News On 6
			303 N. Boston Ave.
			Tulsa, OK 74103


			Newson6.com is proud to provide Oklahomans with timely and relevant news and 

information, sharing the stories, pictures and loves of Oklahomans across our great state.

Station Profile & Public 

Inspection Files



NEWS

6 Investigates
Crime
Education
Special Coverage
Politics
Links
6 In The Morning



WEATHER

WARN Interactive
Street Level Radar
Current Temps
Weather 

101
Weather Community
Storm Tracker
Weather In-Depth



FEATURED

Video
Share
Recipes
Classifieds
Contests
Community
Contact Us
Employment




DIGITAL NETWORK

NewsOn6.com
News9.com

TulsaCW.com
RadioOklahoma.net
OklahomaFarmReport.com




		All content © Copyright 2000 - 2017 KOTV. All Rights 

Reserved. For more information on this site, please read our Privacy Policy, and Terms of Service, and Ad Choices.
	









Home - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation










































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  

















GPAC is here for You
As a blank check company with over $155 million in cash to deploy in a merger,
GPAC is primed to help your company achieve its goals




Latest Press Release
DATE: July 27, 2017
Global Partner Acquisition Corp. and Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter of Intent for Business Combination VIEW CURRENT PRESS RELEASE VIEW ALL PRESS RELEASES




Purple Investor Presentation

View The Purple Investor Presentation














 
 

 
 
 
 




















Global Partner Acquisition Corp. and Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter of Intent for Business Combination - Purple

































Press Releases






Global Partner Acquisition Corp. and Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter of Intent for Business Combination

July 27, 2017Author: Savannah Turk 





Share









Tweet







Share





New York, NY and Alpine, UT July 27, 2017 — Global Partner Acquisition Corp. (NASDAQ: GPAC; GPACW; GPACU), a special purpose acquisition company (“GPAC”), and Purple Innovation, LLC (“Purple”) jointly announced today that on July 24, 2017 they entered into a non-binding letter of intent relating to a business combination (the “LOI”), pursuant to which Purple would become a publicly traded company.
Summary of Transaction
Under the terms of the LOI, GPAC and Purple intend to enter into a definitive agreement, pursuant to which GPAC would acquire Purple based on an enterprise value of $1.1 billion, with GPAC paying a portion of the purchase price in cash to the current equity holders (currently anticipated to be approximately $90 million) and with the remainder being paid in rollover equity interests in the combined public company, subject to customary adjustments. Additional cash will be going to the balance sheet of Purple.
As contemplated by the LOI, Purple founders Terry and Tony Pearce would retain a majority shareholder position in the combined public company with Sam Bernards continuing to lead the combined company as CEO. Founders Terry and Tony Pearce will remain with the combined company.
The net cash proceeds from this transaction that are not distributed to Purple’s shareholders are expected to provide Purple with additional growth capital, allowing Purple to continue executing its long-term growth plan while providing Purple with greater access to capital to fund future innovation and acquisitions.
Completion of the business combination is subject to, among other matters, GPAC and Purple entering into a definitive agreement for the business combination and completing their due diligence investigation of the other, approval by GPAC stockholders and other closing conditions to be included in the merger agreement.
Paul Zepf, CEO of GPAC, said, “I believe Purple is a tremendous merger partner for GPAC, given its powerful brand and highly differentiated portfolio of comfort technology solutions. The company’s revolutionary products, vertically integrated design and manufacturing expertise, and world-class marketing capabilities ideally position the company to disrupt multiple massive industries that are ripe for innovation. We are also very excited by Purple’s financial model that
displays a unique combination of growth, scale, and profitability. We are pleased to partner with Terry, Tony and Sam and look forward to their continued leadership of Purple.”
Purple is a leading comfort technology company which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It designs and manufactures a range of comfort technology products, including mattresses, pillows, and cushions, using its patented Hyper- Elastic Polymer® technology designed to improve comfort. Purple’s founders, Terry and Tony Pearce, have a 20-year history developing innovative comfort technology and, prior to and separate from the launch of Purple, have developed and licensed numerous technologies to notable global brands.
Terry Pearce said, “We are excited to become a publicly traded company through our merger with GPAC. The GPAC team is an ideal partner led by experienced public market investors and executives that will add significant value to Purple. We believe Purple is uniquely positioned in the market and this transaction will allow us to better take advantage of our large market opportunity and continue our rapid, profitable growth.”
Purple’s intellectual property, history of innovation of its founders, and deep vertical integration, including proprietary equipment and design and manufacturing expertise, create a significant competitive moat and differentiate Purple from many competitors that outsource production of their products. Purple’s growth is also supported by a top-notch marketing team that has generated strong brand awareness and has driven customer acquisitions. Purple’s marketing team has also generated a large social media following that is highly engaged with the Purple brand.
Purple markets and sells its products through direct-to-consumer and traditional retail channels. The legacy mattress industry is inefficient, and is characterized by aggressive mark-ups, dated products, and limited innovation. Purple believes there is significant opportunity for further direct-to-consumer penetration within the overall mattress market and that it is one of the leaders of this trend. Direct-to-consumer companies are benefiting from trends including older demographics experiencing discomfort and increasing spending from health-conscious younger demographics. Consumers across demographics are increasingly shopping online, using mobile devices and social media to inform shopping behavior, all of which benefit Purple’s direct-to- consumer and multi-channel distribution strategies.
Purple is pursuing partnerships and opportunities to support its multi-channel distribution strategy. Purple announced in May 2017 plans for an initial test with Mattress Firm and its parent company, Steinhoff, to prominently feature Purple’s products in select retail locations as a store-within-a-store. Mattress Firm has approximately 3,500 locations across the US, representing a significant opportunity for Purple to expand sales through this partnership. Purple has numerous product, channel, and geographic expansion opportunities that it anticipates will drive significant growth.
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Piper Jaffray Companies, and Raymond James & Associates, Inc. are serving as financial and capital markets advisors to GPAC. Headwaters MB LLC is serving as financial advisor to Purple. Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP is acting as legal advisor to GPAC, and Dorsey & Whitney LLP is acting as legal advisor to Purple.
About Purple
Purple is a leading comfort technology company, which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It offers cushions, pillows, and other comfort products using its proprietary Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology. All products are focused on founders Terry and Tony Pearce’s vision to improve comfort. Purple continues to be a disruptor to the traditional mattress industry with its innovative products, packaging and shipping, direct-to- consumer sales, and generous trial and return policies.
About Global Partner Acquisition Corp.
Global Partner Acquisition Corp. is a special purpose acquisition company formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization, or similar business combination. GPAC’s units began trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market on July 30, 2015 and its securities trade on NASDAQ under the ticker symbols GPAC, GPACW and GPACU.
Forward Looking Statements
Certain statements made in this release are “forward looking statements” within the meaning of the “safe harbor” provisions of the United States Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words “estimates,” “projected,” “expects,” “anticipates,” “forecasts,” “plans,” “intends,” “believes,” “seeks,” “may,” “will,” “should,” “future,” “propose” and variations of these words or similar expressions (or the negative versions of such words or expressions) are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These forward- looking statements are not guarantees of future performance, conditions or results, and involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which are outside GPAC’s or Purple’s control, that could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking statements. Important factors, among others, that may affect actual results or outcomes include: the inability to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to the proposed business combination or to complete the transactions contemplated by the LOI; matters discovered by Purple or GPAC as they complete their respective due diligence investigation of the other; the inability to recognize the anticipated benefits of the proposed business combination, which may be affected by, among other things, the amount of cash available following any redemptions by GPAC stockholders; the ability to meet NASDAQ’s listing standards following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the proposed business combination; costs related to the proposed business combination; Purple’s ability to manage growth; Purple’s ability to execute its plans to develop and market new products and the timing and costs of these development programs; Purple’s estimates of the size of the markets for its products; the rate and degree of market acceptance of Purple’s products; the success of other competing cushioning and bedding technologies that exist or may become available; Purple’s ability to identify and integrate acquisitions; the performance of Purple’s products; rising costs adversely affecting Purple’s profitability; potential litigation involving GPAC or Purple or the validity or enforceability of Purple’s intellectual property; and general economic and market conditions impacting demand for Purple’s products. Other factors include the possibility that the proposed transaction does not close, including due to the failure to receive required security holder approvals, or the failure of other closing conditions. Neither GPAC nor Purple undertakes any obligation to update or revise any forward- looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.
Additional Information about the Transaction and Where to Find It
In connection with the proposed business combination, GPAC will file preliminary and definitive proxy statements with the SEC and will mail a definitive proxy statement and other relevant documents to its stockholders. Investors and security holders of GPAC are advised to read, when available, the preliminary proxy statement, and amendments thereto, and the definitive proxy statement in connection with GPAC’s solicitation of proxies for its stockholders’ meeting to be held to approve the proposed business combination because the proxy statements will contain important information about the proposed business combination and the parties to it. The definitive proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of GPAC as of a record date to be established for voting on the proposed business combination. Stockholders will also be able to obtain copies of the proxy statement, without charge, once available, at the SEC’s website at www.sec.gov or by directing a request to: Global Partner Acquisition Corp., c/o Andrew Cook, 1 Rockefeller Plaza, 11th Floor New York, New York 10020, e-mail: info@globalpartnerac.com.
Participants in the Solicitation
GPAC, Purple, and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees, under SEC rules, may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies of GPAC stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination. Investors and security holders may obtain more detailed information regarding the names, affiliations and interests in GPAC’s directors and in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, which was filed with the SEC on March 14, 2017. Information regarding the persons who may, under SEC rules, be deemed participants in the solicitation of proxies to the GPAC’s stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination will be set forth in the proxy statement for the proposed business combination when available. Information concerning the interests of GPAC’s and Purple’s participants in the solicitation, which may, in some cases, be different than those of GPAC’s and Purple’s equity holders generally, will be set forth in the proxy statement relating to the proposed business combination when it becomes available.
Disclaimer
This release shall neither constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.
Contact information
Global Partner Acquisition Corp.
Paul Zepf
Chief Executive Officer
pzepf@globalpartnerac.com
917-244-4880
Purple Innovation, LLC
For information regarding the transaction, please contact Bill Harrison:
Bill Harrison
Head of Consumer Investment Banking, Headwaters MB LLC
wharrison@headwatersmb.com
917-596-5533
For information regarding Purple products, please contact Savannah Turk:
Savannah Turk
Director of Communications, Purple Innovation, LLC
savannah@onpurple.com
801-756-2600 ext 244
 




Let's be Bed Buddies:


 

 

 

 

 

Get Purple Email
Sign up for notifications on product launches, new video releases, and our awesome Purple newsletter!






Get Purple Email Form







First Name
        




Last Name
        




Email Address
        


























I am now a mattress snob! The Purple bed has changed my way of sleeping. After a few nights of sleep on the Purple, I realized that for my entire life I had tricked myself into believing that a sore back was "normal" after a nights rest. Now, I am waking up feeling energized without the nagging back ache. I absolutely LOVE this mattress and tell anyone and everyone about my new boyfriend, my bed :).
Alexandra D.





No Pressure to Try
Sleep on your new mattress for 100 nights – if you don’t love it, we’ll take it back!


No Sleep Pressure
The only mattress with no pressure points – giving you the best sleep of your life.








Cart

×
Close







Subtotal


USD



Payments from

$/MO.


Details ›




Financing options and discount codes are added at checkout.












×


NOT READY TO ORDER YET?
Enter your email to keep up on our new videos, shipping times, new products, and promotions. We promise not to spam you, and you can buy when you’re ready!




Exit Intent Popup

















Submit





No, I Detest Comfort

Yes, sign me up!










 

 



















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Global Partner Acquisition Corp: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback
















global partner acquisition corp
Public Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Companies
Global Partner Acquisition Corp. operates as a special purpose acquisition company. The Company seeks to acquire businesses and assets via merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, and reorganization.




Corporate Information
Address:

1 Rockefeller Plaza
New York, NY 10020
United States


Phone:
1-646-756-2877


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.globalpartnerac.com





Board Members




Chairman
Company










Vice Chairman
Company










Chief Executive Officer
Company


Paul Zepf
Universal Trailer Holdings Corp








Board Members
Company






























From The Web











Key Executives


Paul J Zepf


Chief Executive Officer




D Andrew Cook


Chief Financial Officer







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data








































panot, Author at Global Partner Acquisition Corporation
































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  


















			About panot								
		This author has not yet filled in any details.So far panot has created 0 blog entries.	








 
 

 
 
 
 















Press Releases - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation





































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  















Loading data…





Investor InformationFinancials
Press Releases
Stock Quote
Annual Meeting


 
 

 
 
 
 
















Contact Us - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation



































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  














 







Contact us to discuss your needs further.



















Contact Info

1 Rockefeller Plaza10th FloorNew York, New York 10020
Phone: 646-756-2877
Email: info@globalpartnerac.com

 
 
 

 
 
 
 
















Team - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation







































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  

















Meet Our Team




Paul ZepfCEOPaul Zepf has more than 25 years of private equity investment experience. He started his career in the Merchant Banking Department at Morgan Stanley and later became a managing director of Lazard, Lazard Alternative Investments and Golub Capital. While Paul has completed successful investments across the private equity spectrum, he has specialized in negotiated investments in public and private companies in which the injection of new capital into the partner company allows that company and its management team to take advantage of compelling opportunities or address significant challenges.
Click here for full background



William KerrChairmanWilliam T Kerr William Kerr has more than 30 years of senior management, CEO and board experience. As President and Chief Executive Officer of Arbitron, Inc., he substantially increased shareholder value while leading the company through a successful transition to digital products and services. As Chairman and CEO of Meredith Corporation, he significantly increased shareholder value by expanding the share and profitability of traditional media properties while building a digital media base.
Click here for full background



Andrew CookCFOAndrew Cook has more than 30 years of financial and operational experience. As the founding CFO of three startup reinsurance entities in Bermuda he was responsible for all capital markets activities, investor relations and M&A. He has a proven track record of bringing private companies to the public markets having led successful IPO’s at LaSalle Re and Axis Capital. He was also instrumental in the structuring of the merger of HarborPoint into Alterra Capital. At Alterra he was responsible for implementing corporate synergies as well as the financial, regulatory and the capital structure integrations.
Click here for full background 



Gary DiCamilloVice ChairmanGary DiCamillo has over 29 years of senior management and CEO experience restructuring underperforming businesses. He developed “cut and build” strategies to position companies for sale (Polaroid and Radia International – outsourcing) or to substantially increase shareholder value (Culligan and Black & Decker).
Click here for full background



Pano AnthosDirectorPano Anthos brings over 25 years of technology CEO and founder experience building new businesses in B2B and B2C markets across Web, social, mobile and gaming platforms. Over the last 25 years, Pano has consulted with over 200 of the Fortune 500, partnered with leading technology and media companies such as Oracle and Conde Nast and provided gaming apps to over 3 million Facebook users.
Click here for full background



Jeffrey WeissDirectorJeffrey Weiss has been an investment banker and corporate executive at public and private companies for more than 30 years. For 24 years, through 2014, he was the founder, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of DFC Global, an international financial services company with over $1.3 billion in revenues. Under Jeff’s leadership, DFC became the largest global provider of retail and internet financial services to the under-banked market.
Click here for full background



David ChamberlainAdvisorDavid Chamberlain has over 30 years of general management experience and as CEO has led three successful NYSE consumer companies – Stride Rite, Genesco and Shaklee. At each company he substantially increased shareholder value by rapidly changing failed cultures. He has sold underperforming assets and repositioned and rebuilt numerous brands.
Click here for full background



Michael JohnstonAdvisorMichael Johnston brings over 30 years of experience in the global industrial sector, ranging from aerospace and automotive engineering to appliance manufacturing. He has led restructuring activities to exit uncompetitive product lines and manufacturing operations.
Click here for full background



Neal GoldmanAdvisorNeal Goldman has over 20 years of senior management experience leading and implementing strategic transactions with significant experience in high tech and consumer goods. Neal has advised boards and owners on major financial and commercial restructurings. He played a leadership role in the sale of 3Com to HP and of Skype to Microsoft.
Click here for full background





 
 

 
 
 
 
















Our Criteria - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation



































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  

















Is GPAC a good fit for your company? We can bring our capital and experience to help provide a solution for a broad range of companies and situations. Additionally, we are focused on a transaction with a company that fits within the following parameters:




Our Criteria





Enterprise value
$150 million to $1.0 billion +


Geography
US or international


Current equity ownership type
Private companies and spin-outs from public companies


Target industries
Consumer/Retail, Financial Services, Industrial, Media and Technology


Use of proceeds for the merger partner company, from GPAC’s $155 million of cash and its ability to raise capital in the public markets


Organic growth
Strategic acquisitions
Pay down existing debt
Geographic expansion




Retained ownership for current shareholders
Focus on partnering with a target business combination company
whose existing owners want to retain significant equity upside in the
business, typically between 20-80%, and which could include
control of the public company post-merger


Cash consideration for current shareholders
Flexibility to work with the current shareholders of the
target merger partner to provide them with cash
consideration from 20-80% of their enterprise value


Forms of consideration for current shareholders
Primarily cash and the public stock of combined
companies; however, GPAC can also issue preferred
shares and/or debt as part of the consideration


Public company considerations


Audited financial statements
Ability to communicate the company’s fundamental investment story to the public markets
Prior experience in taking a company public or running a public company is not required; the GPAC team can bring their experience












 
 

 
 
 
 
















Investor Information - Global Partner Acquisition Corporation





































































This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 

This Is A Custom Widget This Sliding Bar can be switched on or off in theme options, and can take any widget you throw at it or even fill it with your custom HTML Code. Its perfect for grabbing the attention of your viewers. Choose between 1, 2, 3 or 4 columns, set the background color, widget divider color, activate transparency, a top border or fully disable it on desktop and mobile.
 





Toggle SlidingBar Area
















  















Loading data…





Investor InformationFinancials
Press Releases
Stock Quote
Annual Meeting


 
 

 
 
 
 






















GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP. (GPACU) IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP. (GPACU) IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP.


Company Address
1 ROCKEFELLER PLAZA10TH FLOORNEW YORK, NY 10020


Company Phone
646-756-2877


Company Website
 -- 


CEO
Paul Zepf


Employees  (as of 7/30/2015) 
2


State of Inc
DE


Fiscal Year End
12/31


Status
Priced (7/30/2015)


Proposed Symbol
GPACU


Exchange
NASDAQ


Share Price
$10.00


Shares Offered
13,500,000


Offer Amount
$135,000,000.00


Total Expenses
$750,000.00


Shares Over Alloted
0


Shareholder Shares Offered
 -- 


Shares Outstanding
16,875,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
1/26/2016


Quiet Period Expiration
9/8/2015


CIK
0001643953




We are offering 13,500,000 units at an offering price of $10.00 per unit. We
estimate that the net proceeds of this offering together with the funds we will
receive from the sale of the private placement warrants will be used as set
forth in the following table.

                                                       Without         Over-Allotment 
                                                    Over-Allotment         Option     
                                                        Option           Exercised    
Gross proceeds                                                                        
Gross proceeds from units offered to public (1)    $  135,000,000     $  155,250,000  
Gross proceeds from private placement warrants                                       
offered in the private placement                        5,800,000          6,407,500  
Total gross proceeds                               $  140,800,000     $  161,657,500  
Offering expenses (2)                                                                 
Underwriting commissions (3.0% of gross proceeds                                     
from units offered to public, excluding deferred                                     
portion) (3)                                       $    4,050,000     $    4,657,500  
Legal fees and expenses                            $      225,000     $      225,000  
Accounting fees and expenses                               37,500             37,500  
Printing Fees and Expenses                                 40,000             40,000  
SEC Filing Fee                                             18,041             18,041  
FINRA Filing Fee                                           23,788             23,788  
Travel and road show                                       20,000             20,000  
Directors and officers insurance                          140,000            140,000  
NASDAQ listing and filing fees                             75,000             75,000  
Miscellaneous expenses                                    170,671            170,671  
Total offering expenses (other than underwriting                                     
commissions)                                       $      750,000     $      750,000  
Proceeds after offering expenses                   $  136,000,000     $  156,250,000  
Held in trust account (3)                          $  135,000,000     $  155,250,000  
% of public offering size                                     100 %              100 %
Not held in trust account                          $    1,000,000     $    1,000,000  

The following table shows the use of the approximately $1,000,000 of net
proceeds not held in the trust account (4).

                                                               Amount      % of Total 
Legal, accounting, due diligence, travel, and other                                  
expenses in connection with any business combination (5)     $   400,000        40.0 %
Legal and accounting fees related to regulatory reporting                            
obligations                                                      150,000        15.0 %
Payment for office space, administrative and support                                 
services                                                         240,000        24.0 %
Reserve for liquidation expenses                                  50,000         5.0 %
NASDAQ continued listing fees                                     75,000         7.5 %
Other miscellaneous expenses                                      85,000         8.5 %
Total                                                        $ 1,000,000       100.0 %

(1) Includes amounts payable to public stockholders who properly redeem their
    shares in connection with our successful completion of our initial business
    combination.

(2) In addition, as of the date of this prospectus, our sponsor has loaned us
    $225,000 to be used for a portion of the expenses of this offering, as 
    described in this prospectus. These loans will be repaid upon completion of
    this offering out of the $750,000 of offering proceeds that has been 
    allocated for the payment of offering expenses other than underwriting 
    commissions. In the event that offering expenses are less than set forth in
    this table, any such amounts will be used for post-closing working capital 
    expenses.

(3) The underwriters have agreed to defer underwriting commissions equal to
    3.0% of the gross proceeds of this offering. Upon completion of our initial
    business combination, up to $4,050,000, which constitutes the underwriters’
    deferred commissions (or up to $4,657,500 if the underwriters’ 
    over-allotment option is exercised in full) will be paid to the underwriters
    from the funds held in the trust account, and the remaining funds will be 
    released to us and can be used to pay all or a portion of the purchase price
    of the business or businesses with which our initial business combination 
    occurs or for general corporate purposes, including payment of principal or
    interest on indebtedness incurred in connection with our initial business 
    combination, to fund the purchases of other companies or for working 
    capital. The underwriters will not be entitled to any interest accrued on 
    the deferred underwriting discounts and commissions.

(4) These expenses are estimates only. Our actual expenditures for some or all
    of these items may differ from the estimates set forth herein. For example,
    we may incur greater legal and accounting expenses than our current 
    estimates in connection with negotiating and structuring a business 
    combination based upon the level of complexity of such business combination.
    In the event we identify an acquisition target in a specific industry 
    subject to specific regulations, we may incur additional expenses associated
    with legal due diligence and the engagement of special legal counsel. In 
    addition, our staffing needs may vary and as a result, we may engage a 
    number of consultants to assist with legal and financial due diligence. We 
    do not anticipate any change in our intended use of proceeds, other than 
    fluctuations among the current categories of allocated expenses, which 
    fluctuations, to the extent they exceed current estimates for any specific 
    category of expenses, would not be available for our expenses. The amount in
    the table above does not include interest available to us from the trust 
    account. Based on the current interest rate environment, we would expect
    approximately $25,000 to be available to us from interest earned on the 
    funds held in the trust account over 24 months following the closing of this
    offering; however, we can provide no assurances regarding this amount. This
    estimate assumes an interest rate of 0.02% per annum based upon current 
    yields of securities in which the trust account may be invested. In 
    addition, in order to finance transaction costs in connection with an 
    intended initial business combination, our sponsor or an affiliate of our 
    sponsor or certain of our officers, directors and director nominees may, but
    are not obligated to, loan us funds as may be required. If we complete our 
    initial business combination, we would repay such loaned amounts out of the
    proceeds of the trust account released to us. Otherwise, such loans would be
    repaid only out of funds held outside the trust account. In the event that 
    our initial business combination does not close, we may use a portion of the
    working capital held outside the trust account to repay such loaned amounts
    but no proceeds from our trust account would be used to repay such loaned 
    amounts. Up to $1,500,000 of such loans may be convertible into warrants of
    the post business combination entity at a price of $0.50 per warrant at the
    option of the lender. The warrants would be identical to the private 
    placement warrants issued to the initial stockholder. The terms of such 
    loans by our sponsor, affiliate of our sponsor, or certain of our officers,
    directors and director nominees, if any, have not been determined and no 
    written agreements exist with respect to such loans. We do not expect to 
    seek loans from parties other than our sponsor or an affiliate of our 
    sponsor as we do not believe third parties will be willing to loan such 
    funds and provide a waiver against any and all rights to seek access to 
    funds in our trust account.

(5) Includes estimated amounts that may also be used in connection with our
    business combination to fund a “no shop” provision and commitment fees for
    financing.

The rules of the NASDAQ Capital Market provide that at least 90% of the gross
proceeds from this offering and the private placement be deposited in a trust
account. Of the net proceeds of this offering and the sale of the private
placement warrants, approximately $135,000,000 (or approximately $155,250,000 if
the underwriters’ over-allotment option is exercised in full), including up to
$4,050,000 (or up to $4,657,500 if the underwriters’ over-allotment option is
exercised in full) of deferred underwriting commissions, will be placed in a
trust account with Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company acting as trustee
and will be invested only in U.S. government treasury bills with a maturity of
180 days or less or in money market funds meeting certain conditions under Rule
2a-7 under the Investment Company Act which invest only in direct U.S.
government treasury obligations. We estimate that the interest earned on the
trust account will be approximately $25,000 per year, assuming an interest rate
of 0.02% per year. We will not be permitted to withdraw any of the principal or
interest held in the trust account, except for the withdrawal of interest to pay
taxes, until the earlier of (i) the completion of our initial business
combination or (ii) the redemption of 100% of our public shares if we are unable
to complete a business combination within 24 months from the closing of this
offering (subject to the requirements of law). Based on current interest rates,
we do not expect that interest earned on the trust account will be sufficient to
pay taxes.

The net proceeds held in the trust account may be used as consideration to pay
the sellers of a target business with which we ultimately complete our business
combination. If our initial business combination is paid for using stock or debt
securities, or not all of the funds released from the trust account are used for
payment of the consideration in connection with our business combination, we may
apply the balance of the cash released from the trust account for general 
corporate purposes, including for maintenance or expansion of operations of the
post-transaction company, the payment of principal or interest due on 
indebtedness incurred in completing our initial business combination, to fund 
the purchase of other companies or for working capital.

We believe that amounts not held in trust will be sufficient to pay the costs
and expenses to which such proceeds are allocated. This belief is based on the
fact that while we may begin preliminary due diligence of a target business in
connection with an indication of interest, we intend to undertake in-depth due
diligence, depending on the circumstances of the relevant prospective
acquisition, only after we have negotiated and signed a letter of intent or
other preliminary agreement that addresses the terms of a business combination.
However, if our estimate of the costs of undertaking in-depth due diligence and
negotiating a business combination is less than the actual amount necessary to
do so, we may be required to raise additional capital, the amount, availability
and cost of which is currently unascertainable. If we are required to seek
additional capital, we could seek such additional capital through loans or
additional investments from our sponsor, members of our management team or their
affiliates, but such persons are not under any obligation to advance funds to,
or invest in, us.

We will enter into an Administrative Services Agreement pursuant to which we
will pay our sponsor a total of $10,000 per month for office space, utilities
and administrative support. Upon completion of our initial business combination
or our liquidation, we will cease paying these monthly fees.

As of the date of this prospectus, our sponsor has loaned us $225,000, to be
used for a portion of the expenses of this offering. These loans are
non-interest bearing, unsecured and are due at the earlier of December 31, 2015
or the closing of this offering. The loans will be repaid upon the closing of
this offering out of the estimated $750,000 of offering proceeds that has been
allocated to the payment of offering expenses.

In addition, in order to finance transaction costs in connection with an
intended initial business combination, our sponsor or an affiliate of our
sponsor or certain of our officers, directors and director nominees may, but are
not obligated to, loan us funds as may be required. If we complete our initial
business combination, we would repay such loaned amounts out of the proceeds of
the trust account released to us. Otherwise, such loans would be repaid only out
of funds held outside the trust account. In the event that our initial business
combination does not close, we may use a portion of the working capital held
outside the trust account to repay such loaned amounts but no proceeds from our
trust account would be used to repay such loaned amounts. Up to $1,500,000 of
such loans may be convertible into warrants of the post business combination
entity at a price of $0.50 per warrant at the option of the lender. The warrants
would be identical to the private placement warrants issued to the initial
stockholder. The terms of such loans by our officers, directors and director
nominees, if any, have not been determined and no written agreements exist with
respect to such loans. We do not expect to seek loans from parties other than
our sponsor or an affiliate of our sponsor as we do not believe third parties
will be willing to loan such funds and provide a waiver against any and all
rights to seek access to funds in our trust account.

If we seek stockholder approval of our initial business combination and we do
not conduct redemptions in connection with our business combination pursuant to
the tender offer rules, our sponsor, directors, officers, advisors or their
affiliates may also purchase shares in privately negotiated transactions either
prior to or following the completion of our initial business combination.
However, they have no current commitments, plans or intentions to engage in such
transactions and have not formulated any terms or conditions for any such
transactions. If they engage in such transactions, they will not make any such
purchases when they are in possession of any material non-public information not
disclosed to the seller or if such purchases are prohibited by Regulation M
under the Exchange Act. We do not currently anticipate that such purchases, if 
any, would constitute a tender offer subject to the tender offer rules under the
Exchange Act or a going-private transaction subject to the going-private rules 
under the Exchange Act; however, if the purchasers determine at the time of any
such purchases that the purchases are subject to such rules, the purchasers will
comply with such rules.

We may not redeem our public shares in an amount that would cause our net
tangible assets to be less than $5,000,001 (so that we are not subject to the
SEC’s “penny stock” rules) and the agreement for our business combination may
require as a closing condition that we have a minimum net worth or a certain
amount of cash. If too many public stockholders exercise their redemption rights
so that we cannot satisfy the net tangible asset requirement or any net worth or
cash requirements, we would not proceed with the redemption of our public shares
or the business combination, and instead may search for an alternate business
combination.

A public stockholder will be entitled to receive funds from the trust account
only upon the earlier to occur of: (i) our completion of an initial business
combination, and then only in connection with those shares of our common stock
that such stockholder properly elected to redeem, subject to the limitations
described herein or (ii) the redemption of our public shares if we are unable to
complete our business combination within 24 months following the closing of this
offering, subject to applicable law and as further described herein and any
limitations (including but not limited to cash requirements) created by the
terms of the proposed business combination. In no other circumstances will a
public stockholder have any right or interest of any kind to or in the trust
account.

Our initial stockholder has entered into a letter agreement with us, pursuant to
which it has to waive its redemption rights with respect to its founder shares
and public shares in connection with the completion of their initial business
combination. In addition, our initial stockholder has agreed to waive its rights
to liquidating distributions from the trust account with respect to its founder
shares if we fail to complete our business combination within the prescribed
time frame. However, if our initial stockholder (or any of our officers,
directors or affiliates) acquires public shares in or after this offering, they
will be entitled to liquidating distributions from the trust account with
respect to such public shares if we fail to complete our initial business
combination within the prescribed time frame.


In identifying, evaluating and selecting a target business for our business
combination, we may encounter intense competition from other entities having a
business objective similar to ours, including other blank check companies,
private equity groups and leveraged buyout funds, and operating businesses
seeking strategic acquisitions. Many of these entities are well established and
have extensive experience identifying and effecting business combinations
directly or through affiliates. Moreover, many of these competitors possess
greater financial, technical, human and other resources than us. Our ability to
acquire larger target businesses will be limited by our available financial
resources. This inherent limitation gives others an advantage in pursuing the
acquisition of a target business. Furthermore, our obligation to pay cash in
connection with our public stockholders who exercise their redemption rights may
reduce the resources available to us for our initial business combination and
our outstanding warrants, and the future dilution they potentially represent,
may not be viewed favorably by certain target businesses. Either of these
factors may place us at a competitive disadvantage in successfully negotiating
an initial business combination.


Company Description
We are a newly organized blank check company incorporated in May 2015 as a
Delaware corporation and formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital
stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization or similar
business combination with one or more businesses, which we refer to


 throughout
this prospectus as our initial business combination. We have not identified any
business combination target and we have not, nor has anyone on our behalf,
initiated any substantive discussions, directly or indirectly, with respect to
identifying any business combination target.

We intend to focus our efforts on seeking and completing an initial business
combination with a company that has an enterprise value of between $300 million
and $1.5 billion, although a target entity with a smaller or larger enterprise
value may be considered. While we may pursue an acquisition opportunity in any
business industry or sector, we intend to capitalize on the ability of our
combined team to identify, acquire and operate a business following the initial
business combination. We believe that the characteristics and capabilities of
our combined team will make us an attractive partner to potential target
businesses, enhance our ability to complete a successful business combination
and bring value to the business post-business combination. Not only does our
combined team bring a combination of operating, investing, financial and
transaction experience, but they have also worked together previously on
multiple private equity investments, consulting assignments and boards of
directors.
---

Our executive offices are currently located at 1 Rockefeller Center, 10th Floor,
New York, New York 10020 and our telephone number is (646) 756-2877.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
 -- 


Net Income
 -- 


Total Assets
$26,000






Total Liabilities
$1,000


Stockholders' Equity
$25,000


View all Company Financials for GPACU


Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 4 Total: 4
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP.
424B4
7/30/2015
Filing



GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1/A
7/27/2015
Filing



GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1/A
7/13/2015
Filing



GLOBAL PARTNER ACQUISITION CORP.
S-1
6/12/2015
Filing



View all SEC Filings for GPACU




Experts


Auditor
WithumSmith+Brown, P.C


Company Counsel
Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP


Lead Underwriter
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.


Transfer Agent
Continental Stock Transfer & Trust Company


Underwriter
I-Bankers Securities, Inc


Underwriter Counsel
Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP









News for GPACU









                        Global Partner Acquisition prices IPO at $10
                    

7/30/2015 8:53:58 AM - Renaissance Capital




 Subscribe


                More GPACU News & Commentary



                Read GPACU Press Releases

















Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            U.S. regulators weigh future of appeal in MetLife case
                        



	                     6:17PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX





































Global Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business CombinationHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballGlobal Partner Acquisition Corp. And Purple Innovation, LLC Announce Letter Of Intent For Business CombinationPR NewswireJuly 27, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareNEW YORK and ALPINE, Utah, July 27, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Global Partner Acquisition Corp. (NASDAQ: GPAC; GPACW; GPACU), a special purpose acquisition company ("GPAC"), and Purple Innovation, LLC ("Purple") jointly announced today that on July 24, 2017 they entered into a non-binding letter of intent relating to a business combination (the "LOI"), pursuant to which Purple would become a publicly traded company.Summary of Transaction Under the terms of the LOI, GPAC and Purple intend to enter into a definitive agreement, pursuant to which GPAC would acquire Purple based on an enterprise value of $1.1 billion, with GPAC paying a portion of the purchase price in cash to the current equity holders (currently anticipated to be approximately $90 million) and with the remainder being paid in rollover equity interests in the combined public company, subject to customary adjustments. Additional cash will be going to the balance sheet of Purple.As contemplated by the LOI, Purple founders Terry and Tony Pearce would retain a majority shareholder position in the combined public company with Sam Bernards continuing to lead the combined company as CEO. Founders Terry and Tony Pearce will remain with the combined company.The net cash proceeds from this transaction that are not distributed to Purple's shareholders are expected to provide Purple with additional growth capital, allowing Purple to continue executing its long-term growth plan while providing Purple with greater access to capital to fund future innovation and acquisitions.Completion of the business combination is subject to, among other matters, GPAC and Purple entering into a definitive agreement for the business combination and completing their due diligence investigation of the other, approval by GPAC stockholders and other closing conditions to be included in the merger agreement.Paul Zepf, CEO of GPAC, said, "I believe Purple is a tremendous merger partner for GPAC, given its powerful brand and highly differentiated portfolio of comfort technology solutions. The company's revolutionary products, vertically integrated design and manufacturing expertise, and world-class marketing capabilities ideally position the company to disrupt multiple massive industries that are ripe for innovation. We are also very excited by Purple's financial model that displays a unique combination of growth, scale, and profitability. We are pleased to partner with Terry, Tony and Sam and look forward to their continued leadership of Purple."Purple is a leading comfort technology company which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It designs and manufactures a range of comfort technology products, including mattresses, pillows, and cushions, using its patented Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology designed to improve comfort. Purple's founders, Terry and Tony Pearce, have a 20-year history developing innovative comfort technology and, prior to and separate from the launch of Purple, have developed and licensed numerous technologies to notable global brands.Terry Pearce said, "We are excited to become a publicly traded company through our merger with GPAC. The GPAC team is an ideal partner led by experienced public market investors and executives that will add significant value to Purple. We believe Purple is uniquely positioned in the market and this transaction will allow us to better take advantage of our large market opportunity and continue our rapid, profitable growth."Purple's intellectual property, history of innovation of its founders, and deep vertical integration, including proprietary equipment and design and manufacturing expertise, create a significant competitive moat and differentiate Purple from many competitors that outsource production of their products. Purple's growth is also supported by a top-notch marketing team that has generated strong brand awareness and has driven customer acquisitions. Purple's marketing team has also generated a large social media following that is highly engaged with the Purple brand.Purple markets and sells its products through direct-to-consumer and traditional retail channels. The legacy mattress industry is inefficient, and is characterized by aggressive mark-ups, dated products, and limited innovation. Purple believes there is significant opportunity for further direct-to-consumer penetration within the overall mattress market and that it is one of the leaders of this trend. Direct-to-consumer companies are benefiting from trends including older demographics experiencing discomfort and increasing spending from health-conscious younger demographics. Consumers across demographics are increasingly shopping online, using mobile devices and social media to inform shopping behavior, all of which benefit Purple's direct-to-consumer and multi-channel distribution strategies.Read MorePurple is pursuing partnerships and opportunities to support its multi-channel distribution strategy. Purple announced in May 2017 plans for an initial test with Mattress Firm to prominently feature Purple's products in select retail locations. Mattress Firm has approximately 3,500 locations across the US, representing a significant opportunity for Purple. Purple has numerous product, channel, and geographic expansion opportunities that it anticipates will drive significant growth.Deutsche Bank Securities Inc., Piper Jaffray Companies, and Raymond James & Associates, Inc. are serving as financial and capital markets advisors to GPAC. Headwaters MB LLC is serving as financial advisor to Purple. Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP is acting as legal advisor to GPAC, and Dorsey & Whitney LLP is acting as legal advisor to Purple.About PurplePurple is a leading comfort technology company, which designs and manufactures products to improve how people sleep, sit, and stand. It offers cushions, pillows, and other comfort products using its proprietary Hyper-Elastic Polymer® technology. All products are focused on founders Terry and Tony Pearce's vision to improve comfort. Purple continues to be a disruptor to the traditional mattress industry with its innovative products, packaging and shipping, direct-to-consumer sales, and generous trial and return policies.About Global Partner Acquisition Corp.Global Partner Acquisition Corp. is a special purpose acquisition company formed for the purpose of effecting a merger, capital stock exchange, asset acquisition, stock purchase, reorganization, or similar business combination. GPAC's units began trading on The NASDAQ Capital Market on July 30, 2015 and its securities trade on NASDAQ under the ticker symbols GPAC, GPACW and GPACU.Forward Looking Statements Certain statements made in this release are "forward looking statements" within the meaning of the "safe harbor" provisions of the United States Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. When used in this press release, the words "estimates," "projected," "expects," "anticipates," "forecasts," "plans," "intends," "believes," "seeks," "may," "will," "should," "future," "propose" and variations of these words or similar expressions (or the negative versions of such words or expressions) are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future performance, conditions or results, and involve a number of known and unknown risks, uncertainties, assumptions and other important factors, many of which are outside GPAC's or Purple's control, that could cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking statements. Important factors, among others, that may affect actual results or outcomes include: the inability to enter into a definitive agreement with respect to the proposed business combination or to complete the transactions contemplated by the LOI; matters discovered by Purple or GPAC as they complete their respective due diligence investigation of the other; the inability to recognize the anticipated benefits of the proposed business combination, which may be affected by, among other things, the amount of cash available following any redemptions by GPAC stockholders; the ability to meet NASDAQ's listing standards following the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the proposed business combination; costs related to the proposed business combination; Purple's ability to manage growth; Purple's ability to execute its plans to develop and market new products and the timing and costs of these development programs; Purple's estimates of the size of the markets for its products; the rate and degree of market acceptance of Purple's products; the success of other competing cushioning and bedding technologies that exist or may become available; Purple's ability to identify and integrate acquisitions; the performance of Purple's products; rising costs adversely affecting Purple's profitability; potential litigation involving GPAC or Purple or the validity or enforceability of Purple's intellectual property; and general economic and market conditions impacting demand for Purple's products. Other factors include the possibility that the proposed transaction does not close, including due to the failure to receive required security holder approvals, or the failure of other closing conditions. Neither GPAC nor Purple undertakes any obligation to update or revise any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, except as required by law.Additional Information about the Transaction and Where to Find It In connection with the proposed business combination, GPAC will file preliminary and definitive proxy statements with the SEC and will mail a definitive proxy statement and other relevant documents to its stockholders. Investors and security holders of GPAC are advised to read, when available, the preliminary proxy statement, and amendments thereto, and the definitive proxy statement in connection with GPAC's solicitation of proxies for its stockholders' meeting to be held to approve the proposed business combination because the proxy statements will contain important information about the proposed business combination and the parties to it. The definitive proxy statement will be mailed to stockholders of GPAC as of a record date to be established for voting on the proposed business combination. Stockholders will also be able to obtain copies of the proxy statement, without charge, once available, at the SEC's website at www.sec.gov or by directing a request to: Global Partner Acquisition Corp., c/o Andrew Cook, 1 Rockefeller Plaza, 11th Floor New York, New York 10020, e-mail: info@globalpartnerac.com.Participants in the Solicitation GPAC, Purple, and their respective directors, executive officers and other members of their management and employees, under SEC rules, may be deemed to be participants in the solicitation of proxies of GPAC stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination. Investors and security holders may obtain more detailed information regarding the names, affiliations and interests in GPAC's directors and in its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016, which was filed with the SEC on March 14, 2017. Information regarding the persons who may, under SEC rules, be deemed participants in the solicitation of proxies to the GPAC's stockholders in connection with the proposed business combination will be set forth in the proxy statement for the proposed business combination when available. Information concerning the interests of GPAC's and Purple's participants in the solicitation, which may, in some cases, be different than those of GPAC's and Purple's equity holders generally, will be set forth in the proxy statement relating to the proposed business combination when it becomes available.DisclaimerThis release shall neither constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities, nor shall there be any sale of securities in any jurisdiction in which the offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to the registration or qualification under the securities laws of any such jurisdiction.Contact information Global Partner Acquisition Corp. Paul Zepf Chief Executive Officer pzepf@globalpartnerac.com 917-244-4880Purple Innovation, LLC For information regarding the transaction, please contact Bill Harrison: Bill Harrison Head of Consumer Investment Banking, Headwaters MB LLC  wharrison@headwatersmb.com  917-596-5533For information regarding Purple products, please contact Savannah Turk: Savannah Turk Director of Communications, Purple Innovation, LLC savannah@onpurple.com 801-756-2600 ext 244View original content:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/global-partner-acquisition-corp-and-purple-innovation-llc-announce-letter-of-intent-for-business-combination-300495476.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderSo Simple - 3 Clicks & Windows Will Work Like NewReimagePlusSponsoredTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderGoogle is quietly buying properties worth $820 million in Silicon Valley as it looks to keep growingCNBCEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekTrump names John F. Kelly new chief of staff; Reince Priebus outCNBCTrunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsoredThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceNorth Korea 2nd ICBM test puts much of US in range: expertsAssociated PressVirgin Atlantic founder Sir Richard Branson sells 31pc stake in airline for £220m as part of new tie-up with Air France-KLMThe TelegraphDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredMy bullish view on stocks hasn't changed one iota: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoBlue Apron: Bullish calls not all they're cooked up to beYahoo FinanceDonald Trump Tweet-Rages After John McCain Kills Obamacare Skinny RepealStan: Let trump rage.  McCain you did the right thing.Join the Conversation1 / 52.2k








